North Dakota statutes. TITLE 58 Townships
CHAPTER 58-01 General Provisions

58-01-01.
Township defined.

Whenever in this title the word “township” is used without any other descriptive word or phrase, a civil township is referred to without regard to the number of congressional townships incorporated therein.

Source:

R.C. 1943, § 58-0101.

58-01-01.1.
Freeholder defined.

As used in this title, unless the context or subject matter requires otherwise, “freeholder” means the legal title owner of the surface estate in real property.

Source:

S.L. 2001, ch. 553, § 3.

58-01-02.
Territory in city not subject to provisions of title.

Nothing contained in this title applies in any way to any portion of the state which is embraced within the limits of any incorporated city.

Source:

S.L. 1883, ch. 112, sub. ch. 1, § 121; R.C. 1895, § 2676; R.C. 1899, § 2676; R.C. 1905, § 3216; C.L. 1913, § 4272; R.C. 1943, § 58-0102.

58-01-03.
Conveyance to township — If for benefit of inhabitant need not be in township name.

Each conveyance of land within the limits of a township made in any manner for the use or benefit of its inhabitants has the same effect as if made to the township by name.

Source:

S.L. 1883, ch. 112, sub. ch. 1, § 10; R.C. 1895, § 2539; R.C. 1899, § 2539; R.C. 1905, § 3060; C.L. 1913, § 4085; R.C. 1943, § 58-0103.

58-01-04.
Presumption of regular enactment, adoption, or amendment of bylaws, resolutions, or regulations.

Three years after enactment or amendment of township bylaws or adoption or amendment of township resolutions or regulations it is conclusively presumed that the bylaws, resolutions, or regulations were enacted, adopted, or amended as required by law.

Source:

S.L. 1993, ch. 95, § 3.